Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1236
Act; construction with other laws.

The provisions of the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act shall not be construed to supersede, limit, or otherwise affect the state emergency management laws or any interstate civil defense compact participated in by the State of Nebraska dealing with the licenses for professional, mechanical, or other skills of persons performing emergency management functions.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 27;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5198;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 520.